Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 S TATE FORESTRY COMMISSION
12-6-22.1. Control of aviation; power of commission.

The commission shall be authorized to acquire, operate, maintain, house, and dispose of all state aviation assets assigned to the commission, to provide aviation services and oversight of such state aircraft and aviation operations for the mission of the commission and legitimate state business purposes, to achieve policy objectives through aviation missions, and to provide for the efficient operation of such state aircraft.

All aircraft under the custody and control of the Georgia Aviation Authority as of June 30, 2012, which were previously transferred to the authority by the commission and associated parts and equipment and any budgeted operating funds associated with such aircraft shall be transferred on July 1, 2012, back to the custody and control of the commission.

Any persons who as of June 30, 2012, were employed by the Georgia Aviation Authority pursuant to previous transfer from the commission to the authority shall be transferred back to the commission on July 1, 2012, and shall no longer be under the administration or direction of the authority.

All airfields and appurtenances, including hangars, previously transferred to the Georgia Aviation Authority by the commission and all accounts receivable, budgeted operating funds, other funds, contracts, liabilities, and obligations associated with the aircraft being transferred back to the commission as of July 1, 2012, shall become the property, accounts receivable, budgeted operating funds, other funds, contracts, liabilities, and obligations of the commission on such date.

The commission shall be responsible for providing aviation services in support of the mission of the commission. The commission shall be authorized to dispose of any state aircraft assigned to the commission and apply the proceeds derived therefrom to the purchase of replacement aviation assets.

The commission shall have the power to:

Hire, organize, and train personnel to operate, maintain, house, purchase, and dispose of aviation assets;

Purchase, lease, maintain, develop, and modify facilities to support aviation assets and operations;

Develop operating, maintenance, safety, security, training, education, and scheduling standards for commission aviation operations and conduct inspections, audits, and other similar oversight to determine practices and compliance with such standards;

Develop an accountability system for commission aviation operations and activities;

Identify the costs associated with training, education, and the purchase, operation, maintenance, and administration of state aircraft assigned to the commission and aviation operations and related facilities;

In conjunction with the Georgia Aviation Authority, develop an appropriate joint billing structure for passenger transportation where the aircraft is designated and operated as a "civil aircraft" under Part 91 of the Federal Aviation Regulations and charge agencies and other state entities for the full variable hourly costs for the operation of each type of aircraft, evaluated annually and adjusted as necessary based upon the price of fuel, maintenance, and other fees that are a direct result of flying the aircraft on that specific trip; provided, however, that any billing to an agency by the commission shall be suspended whenever the Governor declares a state of emergency on any cost associated with aircraft used during and in response to such state of emergency;

Retain appropriate external consulting and auditing expertise;

Engage aviation industry representatives to ensure best practices for commission aviation assets;

Delegate certain powers pursuant to this article to other state entities;

Otherwise implement appropriate and efficient management practices for commission aviation operations; and

Enter into agreements with the Georgia Aviation Authority for mutual use of state airfields and appurtenances, including aircraft hangars.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-22.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1082, § 3/SB 339.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, Code Section 12-6-25, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1082,

§

3/SB 339, was redesignated as Code Section 12-6-22.1.